Florida, session 2026, SB730.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 1006.149, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 1006.149âNotification of sexual violence policies and 19 supportive measures.â 20 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 21 (a)ââChild advocacy centerâ means a center that coordinates 22 the investigation, treatment, and prosecution of child abuse 23 cases by using multidisciplinary teams of professionals involved 24 in child protective and victim advocacy services, law 25 enforcement and prosecution, and physical and mental health 26 services. 27 (b)ââFrequently encountered languageâ means a language that 28 is the primary language spoken by: 29 1.âAt least 5 percent of the overall student and employee 30 population of the school; 31 2.âAt least 5 percent of the population in the county in 32 which the school is located; or 33 3.âAt least 1,000 people in the county in which the school 34 is located. 35 (c)ââSchoolâ means a public K-12 school, public 36 postsecondary educational institution, or a private K-12 school, 37 college, or university. 38 (d)ââSexual assault service providerâ means an agency that 39 provides victim advocacy and support services to survivors of 40 sexual violence. 41 (e)ââSexual violence policiesâ means any policy, procedure, 42 protocol, guideline, or rule regarding sexual assault, sexual 43 abuse, domestic violence, dating violence, and stalking that 44 occurs on school premises, on school transportation, or at a 45 school-sponsored off-campus event, or where a student, school 46 staff, or school volunteer is the purported victim or offender. 47 (f)ââSupportive measuresâ means nondisciplinary or 48 nonpunitive individualized measures related to sexual assault, 49 sexual abuse, domestic violence, dating violence, and stalking 50 which are offered to a student, the school staff, or a school 51 volunteer to protect the safety of all parties, provide 52 reasonable accommodations, and support educational success. 53 (2)(a)âA schoolâs sexual violence policies must meet all of 54 the following requirements: 55 1.âInclude options for a student to report an incident of 56 sexual assault, sexual abuse, domestic violence, dating 57 violence, or stalking to the school or law enforcement. 58 2.âInclude the rights of victims and offenders during any 59 investigation or disciplinary proceedings conducted by the 60 school. 61 3.âInclude the process the school will use for the 62 investigation and disciplinary proceedings, including any right 63 to an appeal. 64 4.âInclude whether or not the school has an affirmative 65 duty to report to law enforcement when a report is made to the 66 school. 67 5.âBe written in clear, plain language in a color, size, 68 and font that enhances readability. 69 6.âBe available in frequently encountered languages to 70 ensure timely and meaningful access for students, parents, 71 school staff, and school volunteers with limited English 72 proficiency. Processes should be in place for access to the 73 material in less frequently encountered languages through oral 74 interpretation upon request. 75 (b)âA schoolâs supportive measures must include, if 76 available, the current: 77 1.âName, title, e-mail address, mailing address, and 78 telephone number of the person designated by the school to 79 receive reports of violations of the sexual violence policies 80 and to provide information regarding sexual violence policies 81 and supportive measures. 82 2.âName, telephone number, and website address for a local, 83 state, or national hotline providing information to victims of 84 sexual assault or sexual abuse. 85 3.âName, telephone number, and website address of the 86 nearest child advocacy center and sexual assault service 87 provider. 88 (c)âA schoolâs supportive measures may include, but not be 89 limited to, the following: 90 1.âCounseling, health care, and mental health care. 91 2.âVictim advocacy and legal assistance. 92 3.âExtensions of deadlines or other class-related 93 adjustments, modifications of work or class schedules, and 94 campus safety escorts. 95 4.âMutual restrictions on contact between relevant parties, 96 changes in work or housing locations, leaves of absence, 97 increased security and monitoring of certain areas of the 98 school, or other similar measures. 99 (3)âEach school shall notify every student, parent, school 100 staff, and school volunteer of the schoolâs existing sexual 101 violence policies and supportive measures by: 102 (a)âIncluding the schoolâs sexual violence policies and 103 supportive measures in any student, parent, school staff, or 104 school volunteer handbook or catalog or similar publication 105 listing rights, responsibilities, or standards of conduct. 106 (b)âProviding the sexual violence policies and supportive 107 measures directly to a student, parent, school staff, or school 108 volunteer using the process by which the student, parent, school 109 staff, or school volunteer has elected to receive communication 110 from the school. 111 1.âFor students and parents, schools shall provide the 112 sexual violence policies and supportive measures at the time of 113 initial enrollment or registration, and each academic year 114 thereafter within 30 days after the first day of school. 115 2.âFor school staff or school volunteers, schools shall 116 provide the sexual violence policies and supportive measures at 117 the time the school staff is hired or the school volunteer 118 begins volunteering and require that school staff and school 119 volunteers review the sexual violence policies and supportive 120 measures each academic year thereafter within 30 days after the 121 first day of school. 122 (c)âPlacing a physical copy of the sexual violence policies 123 and supportive measures in a clearly visible location and public 124 area of the school which is readily accessible to and widely 125 used by students, and in a location that is readily accessible 126 to parents, school staff, and school volunteers. 127 (d)âPosting the sexual violence policies and supportive 128 measures in a prominent location on the schoolâs website which 129 is accessible from the homepage by not more than three clicks. 130 The school shall also provide a copy of the policies to the 131 school district, or governing body of the institution, to be 132 posted on that organizationâs website which is accessible from 133 the home page by not more than three clicks. 134 (4)âTo provide notice to a student under 18 years of age, 135 the school shall provide the notice to the studentâs parents. 136 However, the school may also provide notice to the student in an 137 age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate manner. 138 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.